Nebraska, session 109, LB721.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-3145, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3145 (1) The Intergenerational Care Facility Incentive Grant Program is
created. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate three hundred
thousand dollars from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund for fiscal
year 2024-25 to the Department of Health and Human Services to provide grants
pursuant to this section.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop requirements
for eligibility, application, and audits for grants in collaboration with
statewide associations representing nursing homes as defined in section 38-2414
and other stakeholders. The department shall meet with such associations prior
to October 1, 2024, to identify any statutes, rules, regulations, or other
regulatory barriers that impede the development of an intergenerational care
facility in which nursing services and child care are provided and develop
recommendations to remediate such barriers that do not impact the safety of the
staff or recipients of the nursing services and child care or the quality of
nursing services and child care.
(3) The grants shall be awarded to facilities that are nursing homes as
defined in section 38-2414 or assisted-living facilities as defined in section
71-5903 and that have been certified for participation in medicare or medicaid.
The grants shall be used for one-time startup or expansion costs to provide for
child care in such facilities. A facility may be awarded one grant under this
section of up to one hundred thousand dollars. The grants shall be awarded for
modification of structures, modification of outside campus space of the nursing
facilities, purchase of child care equipment and supplies, or any combination
of such purposes. A facility that is applying for or awarded a grant is not
required to own or operate the child care services for which the grant is
awarded. A facility may not apply for a grant if it has previously received a
grant under this section.
(4) The department shall award the grants to nonprofit and proprietary
facilities on the basis of date of application with priority given to rural
communities, as defined in section 81-1228, for applications filed on the same
date. A facility that was cited for substandard quality of care during its most
recent survey is not eligible for a grant under this section. Each grant
recipient shall establish a plan to participate in the quality rating and
improvement system described in section 71-1956 within three years after the
date the grant is awarded.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-3145, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-